Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,102
Schoolhouse; where built.

No school district shall build a schoolhouse outside its district except as provided in section 79-10,119 or when built on land owned by the federal government when such land is controlled under a freeholders lease agreement.

Laws 1951, c. 277, § 3, p. 937;

Laws 1955, c. 309, § 1, p. 953;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-425.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 748.